Washington statutes.
RCW 35.02.210

Fire protection district and library district—Continuation of services at option of city or town.

At the option of the governing body of a newly incorporated city or town, any fire protection district or library district serving any part of the area so incorporated shall continue to provide services to such area until the city or town receives its own property tax receipts.

[ 1991 c 360 s 8; 1986 c 234 s 21; 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.03.160. Formerly RCW 35A.03.160.]